Hawaii statutes.
§467-9.5 Prerequisites for examination.
(a) No individual shall be eligible for
the licensing examination unless the individual is:

(1) A United States citizen, a United States
national, or an alien authorized to work in the United States, and of the age
of majority; and

(2) Applying for:

(A) The real estate salesperson examination
and has satisfactorily completed a commission-approved prelicensing course for
real estate salesperson candidates, which includes real estate principles, or
its equivalent as determined by the commission; or

(B) The real estate broker examination and:

(i) Holds a current, unencumbered Hawaii real
estate salesperson license or a current, unencumbered real estate salesperson
or broker license in another state or in a jurisdiction recognized by the
Association of Real Estate License Law Officials, with an equivalent real
estate licensing law as determined by the commission;

(ii) Has satisfactorily completed a
commission-approved prelicensing course for real estate broker candidates, or
its equivalent as determined by the commission; and

(iii) Has experience as a full-time
Hawaii-licensed real estate salesperson associated with a Hawaii-licensed real
estate broker for at least three years of the five-year period immediately
prior to the submission of the experience certification application and has
practical real estate salesperson experience, as certified by the principal
broker, principal brokers, broker in charge, or brokers in charge, as the case
may be, during the subject period. The candidate shall secure commission
approval of the candidate's experience certification application prior to the
date of the examination. Subject to commission approval, a candidate may
request a determination of equivalency for the experience requirement based on
real estate salesperson license experience or a current, unencumbered real
estate broker license in another state, or in a jurisdiction recognized by the
Association of Real Estate License Law Officials, with an equivalent real
estate licensing law as determined by the commission.

(b) Each individual shall certify that the
prerequisites set forth in this section have been or will be satisfied prior to
the date of examination. The examination score of any individual who has taken
the examination without having satisfied the prerequisites set forth in this
section prior to the date of examination shall be voided. [L 1973, c 131, pt of
§3; am L 1975, c 42, §1; am L 1982, c 270, §2; am L 1983, c 116, §3; am L 1986,
c 106, §1; am L 1989, c 203, §1 and c 217, §2; am L 1990, c 5, §1; am L 1993, c
125, §2; am L 1994, c 100, §6; am L 1995, c 241, §4; am L 1999, c 240, §4; am L
2001, c 245, §1; am L 2002, c 129, §3]

Note

$25 fee for equivalency determination application. L 2002, c
129, §7.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next